Georgia statutes. TITLE 38 Military, Emergency Management, and Veterans Affairs
PART 3 Georgia Veterans Cemeteries

Cross references.

Creation of Georgia Veterans Service Foundation, Inc., §

38-4-14

.

38-4-70.
Cemeteries established; eligibility for interment.

The Department of Veterans Service is authorized to establish, operate, and maintain Georgia veterans cemeteries in this state; provided, however, that the Georgia veterans cemetery in existence on July 1, 2002, shall be known as the “Georgia Veterans Memorial Cemetery.”

The Department of Veterans Service has the primary responsibility for verifying eligibility for interment in a Georgia veterans cemetery. Eligibility criteria for interment in a Georgia veterans cemetery is the same as required for interment in a national cemetery as provided by federal law and rules and regulations applicable thereto.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-4-70

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 877, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 797, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1135, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 1479, § 1/HB 440.

38-4-71.
Control of cemeteries; applications for interment.

Each Georgia veterans cemetery shall be under the control and administration of the Department of Veterans Service.

Applications for interment in a Georgia veterans cemetery shall be processed in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the Department of Veterans Service.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-4-71

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 877, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 797, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1135, § 1.

38-4-72.
Receipt of federal aid and gifts, contributions, bequests, and reimbursements; expenditure; departmental personnel.

The Department of Veterans Service is designated as the agency of this state to receive federal aid under Title 38 U.S.C., as amended, and is authorized and directed to receive funds from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or any other agency of the United States authorized to grant or expend funds to assist a state in establishing, operating, and maintaining a veterans cemetery. The Department of Veterans Service is authorized to receive gifts, contributions, bequests, and individual reimbursements from any source, the receipt of which shall not exclude any other source of revenue. All funds received by the Department of Veterans Service pursuant to this Code section shall be expended to establish, operate, and maintain veterans cemeteries in this state. The Department of Veterans Service is authorized to employ such personnel as it may deem necessary to carry out its duties and responsibilities under this part.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-4-72

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 877, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 45, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 797, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1135, § 1.